District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.05

Omitted

District of Columbia Board of Registration for Professional Engineers — Created; duty; composition; appointment; qualifications; term of office; oath of office; removal; vacancies.

Omitted.

Disclosure of financial interests, requirements, see § 1-1106.02.
1981 Ed., § 2-2305.

The provisions of former § 2-2305 1981 Ed. have been omitted as obsolete, the Board referred to herein having been abolished.

Board of Registration for Professional Engineers abolished. The District of Columbia Board of Registration for Professional Engineers was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. The functions were delegated to the Department of Occupations and Professions by Reorganization Order No. 59, dated June 30, 1953. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Section 402 (64), (65), (66), (67) and (68) of the Plan transferred the regulatory and other functions of the Board of Commissioners, under § 47-2886.08, to the District of Columbia Council to the extent and in the particulars specified in that section, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided by § 406 of the Plan. The functions delegated the Department of Occupations and Professions were subsequently transferred to the Director of the Department of Economic Development by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. The Department of Economic Development was replaced by Mayor’s Order 78-42, dated February 17, 1978, which Order established the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspection.

The functions of the Department of Licenses, Investigations and Inspections were transferred to the Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983.

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.